Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.446

Subpoenas, discovery, and protective orders.

(1) The presiding officer may issue subpoenas and may enter protective orders. A subpoena may be issued with like effect by the agency or the attorney of record in whose behalf the witness is required to appear.

(2) An agency may by rule determine whether or not discovery is to be available in adjudicative proceedings and, if so, which forms of discovery may be used.

(3) Except as otherwise provided by agency rules, the presiding officer may decide whether to permit the taking of depositions, the requesting of admissions, and all other procedures authorized by rules 26 through 36 of the superior court civil rules. The presiding officer may condition use of discovery on a showing of necessity and unavailability by other means. In exercising such discretion, the presiding officer shall consider: (a) Whether all parties are represented by counsel; (b) whether undue expense or delay in bringing the case to hearing will result; (c) whether the discovery will promote the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceeding; and (d) whether the interests of justice will be promoted.

(4) Discovery orders and protective orders entered under this section may be enforced under the provisions of this chapter on civil enforcement of agency action.

(5) Subpoenas issued under this section may be enforced under RCW 34.05.588(1).

(6) The subpoena powers created by this section shall be statewide in effect.

(7) Witnesses in an adjudicatory proceeding shall be paid the same fees and allowances, in the same manner and under the same conditions, as provided for witnesses in the courts of this state by chapter 2.40 RCW and by RCW 5.56.010, except that the agency shall have the power to fix the allowance for meals and lodging in like manner as is provided in RCW 5.56.010 as to courts. The person initiating an adjudicative proceeding or the party requesting issuance of a subpoena shall pay the fees and allowances and the cost of producing records required to be produced by subpoena.

[ 1989 c 175 s 17; 1988 c 288 s 413; 1967 c 237 s 10. Formerly RCW 34.04.105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.